Wisconsin, session 2025, SB635.
do enact as follows:SB635,11Section 1. 20.835 (2) (g) of the statutes is created to read:SB635,2,3220.835 (2) (g) Premarital counseling credit. A sum sufficient to make the 3payments under s. 71.07 (9h) (d) 2.SB635,24Section 2. 71.07 (9h) of the statutes is created to read:SB635,2,6571.07 (9h) Premarital counseling credit. (a) Definitions. In this 6subsection:SB635,2,771. “Claimant” means an individual who files a claim under this subsection.SB635,2,982. “Member of the clergy” means a spiritual adviser of any religion, regardless 9of the adviser’s title.SB635,2,10103. “Qualified counselor” means any of the following:SB635,2,1311a. A psychologist or a psychiatrist that uses the title “marriage and family 12therapist,” “marriage and family counselor,” or “professional counselor,” as provided 13under s. 457.02 (3).SB635,2,1514b. An individual granted a marriage and family therapist license, as provided 15under s. 457.10.SB635,2,1616c. A member of the clergy.SB635,2,2117(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, and 18subject to the limitations provided in this subsection, a claimant may claim as a 19credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.02 the following amounts, if the claimant 20and the claimant’s spouse completed a course or program of premarital counseling 21provided by a qualified counselor before marriage:SB635,2,23221. If the claimant and the claimant’s spouse file a joint return, one of the 23following:SB635,3,21a. For the first taxable year in which the claimant and the claimant’s spouse 2are married, $600.SB635,3,43b. For the 2nd taxable year in which the claimant and the claimant’s spouse 4are married, $300.SB635,3,65c. For the 3rd taxable year in which the claimant and the claimant’s spouse 6are married, $100.SB635,3,872. If the claimant and the claimant’s spouse file separate returns, one of the 8following:SB635,3,109a. For the first taxable year in which the claimant and the claimant’s spouse 10are married, $300.SB635,3,1211b. For the 2nd taxable year in which the claimant and the claimant’s spouse 12are married, $150.SB635,3,1413c. For the 3rd taxable year in which the claimant and the claimant’s spouse 14are married, $50.SB635,3,1815(c) Limitations. 1. No credit may be allowed under this subsection unless the 16claimant submits with the claimant’s return written certification from a qualified 17counselor that the claimant and the claimant’s spouse completed a course or 18program of premarital counseling before marriage.SB635,3,20192. No credit may be allowed under this subsection unless it is claimed within 20the period under s. 71.75 (2).SB635,3,23213. No credit may be allowed under this subsection for a taxable year covering 22a period of less than 12 months, except for a taxable year closed by reason of the 23death of the claimant.SB635,4,214. No credit may be allowed under this subsection for any taxable year in 2which the claimant and the claimant’s spouse are divorced.SB635,4,435. The credit under this subsection cannot be claimed by a part-year resident 4or a nonresident of this state.SB635,4,65(d) Administration. 1. Subsection (9e) (d), to the extent that it applies to the 6credit under that subsection, applies to the credit under this subsection.SB635,4,1172. If the allowable amount of the claim under this subsection exceeds the 8taxes otherwise due under this chapter or no taxes are due under this chapter, the 9amount of the claim not used to offset taxes due shall be certified by the department 10of revenue to the department of administration for payment by check, share draft, 11or other draft drawn from the appropriation under s. 20.835 (2) (g).SB635,312Section 3. 71.10 (4) (i) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, 13is amended to read:SB635,4,231471.10 (4) (i) The total of claim of right credit under s. 71.07 (1), farmland 15preservation credit under ss. 71.57 to 71.61, farmland preservation credit, 2010 and 16beyond under s. 71.613, homestead credit under subch. VIII, jobs tax credit under s. 1771.07 (3q), business development credit under s. 71.07 (3y), research credit under s. 1871.07 (4k) (e) 2. a., film production services credit under s. 71.07 (5f) (b) 2., veterans 19and surviving spouses property tax credit under s. 71.07 (6e), enterprise zone jobs 20credit under s. 71.07 (3w), electronics and information technology manufacturing 21zone credit under s. 71.07 (3wm), earned income tax credit under s. 71.07 (9e), 22premarital counseling credit under s. 71.07 (9h), estimated tax payments under s. 2371.09, and taxes withheld under subch. X.SB635,4,2424